apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_det_pr_prn.ca.dix
    <pardef n="/de__pr"><!--MG: Inclou contracció amb articles -->
      <e r="LR"> 
	<p>
	  <l>de</l>
	  <r>de<s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>   
      <e r="RL"> 
	<p>
	  <l><a/>de</l>
	  <r>de<s n="pr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>   
      <e r="LR"> 
	<p>
	  <l>del</l>
	  <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>     
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>dels</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>   
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>meus</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>meu</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
 
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>teus</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>teu</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>seus</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>seu</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> 
    
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>meus</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>meu</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>meu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
     
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>teus</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>teu</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>teu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
     
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>seus</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>seu</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>seu<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   
          
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>nostres</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>nostre</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>nostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>   
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dels<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>del<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="abans de"><i>abans<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a causa de"><i>a<b/>causa<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a fora de"><i>a<b/>fora<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a través de"><i>a<b/>través<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="al llarg de"><i>al<b/>llarg<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="al voltant de"><i>al<b/>voltant<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="cap amunt de"><i>cap<b/>amunt<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="darrere de"><i>darrere<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="davant de"><i>davant<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="des de"><i>des<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="de"><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="després de"><i>després<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="dins de"><i>dins<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="fora de"><i>fora<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="lluny de"><i>lluny<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="per sobre de"><i>per<b/>sobre<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="per tal de"><i>per<b/>tal<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="prop de"><i>prop<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sota de"><i>sota<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
<e lm="en nom de"><i>en<b/>nom<b/></i><par n="/de__pr"/></e>
